Oregon, session 2026R1, SB1520.
Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. ORS 657B.430 is amended to read:
657B.430. (1) The Paid Family and Medical Leave Insurance Fund is established in the State
Treasury, separate and distinct from the General Fund. The Paid Family and Medical Leave Insur-
ance Fund is declared to be a trust fund.
(2) The fund consists of moneys deposited in the fund from contributions made under ORS
657B.150 and from penalties, fees, revenues and all other amounts deposited in or credited to the
fund. Interest earned by the fund shall be credited to the fund.
(3) Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to the Director of the Employment De-
partment and may be used solely to:
(a) Carry out the purposes set forth in this chapter, including the payment of administrative
costs and expenses that the director incurs in carrying out the provisions of this chapter; and
(b) Pay the compensation of the Director of the Employment Department in accordance with
ORS 657.608.
(4)(a) To ensure compliance with tax reporting and withholding requirements, the direc-
tor may adopt rules establishing an accounting system for contributions made to and bene-
fits paid from the fund. The accounting system may include a method for:
(A) Allocating moneys from the fund for the payment of benefits by type of qualifying
leave available under this chapter; and
(B) Restricting the use of moneys for the payment of benefits for a specific type of leave
to moneys received solely from employee contributions, solely from employer contributions
or a combination of employee and employer contributions in a manner determined by the
director.
(b) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed as authorizing the director to change
the percentage of the total rate of contributions required to be paid by employers and em-
ployees under ORS 657B.150 beyond the authority granted to the director under ORS 657B.150
(1).
SECTION 2. This 2026 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2026
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1520 (SB 1520-INTRO) Page 1

Passed by Senate February 10, 2026 Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Approved:
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Passed by House February 20, 2026
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
.................................................................................. ........................M.,........................................................., 2026
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1520 (SB 1520-INTRO) Page 2